Montana, session 2025, HB718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Office of reentry services -- purpose -- duties --collaboration --stakeholder
engagement -- report. (1) There is an office of reentry services in the department of labor and industry.
(2) The purpose of the office is to create a collaborative effort among state agencies to coordinate
supportive services for individuals who are exiting or preparing to exit incarceration and reenter communities in
Montana, including but not limited to expansion of existing programs and new programs related to:
(a) job training for incarcerated individuals, including skilled-trade and apprenticeship programs;
(b) job placement for individuals after exiting incarceration;
(c) workforce and supportive services, including career education;
(d) the availability of and access to online certificate training programs;
(e) the availability of and access to general or secondary education programs;
(f) initiatives to teach entrepreneurship;
(g) transition planning and housing assistance;
(h) initiatives to ensure individuals exiting incarceration have adequate transportation and food
security; and
(i) coordination of care to address behavioral health needs of individuals, including initiatives that
improve access to substance abuse and mental health treatment facilities for individuals exiting incarceration.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 718
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 718
(3) The office shall coordinate existing reentry programs and services, including grant programs, in
collaboration with companies, stakeholder organizations, and agencies, including but not limited to the
following:
(a) department of commerce;
(b) department of corrections;
(c) department of justice;
(d) department of public health and human services;
(e) office of commissioner of higher education; and
(f) office of public instruction.
(4) The office shall consult with the Montana state workforce innovation board established in 53-2-
1203 to engage in stakeholder outreach in the development of services prescribed in subsection (2).
Stakeholders shall include but are not limited to members of the business, mental health, substance use
treatment, criminal justice advocacy, and affordable and transitional housing sectors.
(5) By July 1 prior to each legislative session, the department shall submit a report to the
legislative finance committee and the law and justice interim committee in accordance with 5-11-210. The
report must include a description of the services provided by the office of reentry services over the biennium,
the cost of services rendered, and the number of individuals served.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as a new part in Title 39,
chapter 11, and the provisions of Title 39, chapter 11, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 718
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 718, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 718
INTRODUCED BY K. SEEKINS-CROWE, L. BENNETT, S. FITZPATRICK, B. LER, K. ZOLNIKOV, L.
BREWSTER
AN ACT ESTABLISHING AN OFFICE OF REENTRY SERVICES IN THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRY; ESTABLISHING A PURPOSE AND DUTIES OF THE OFFICE; PROVIDING THAT THE OFFICE
OF REENTRY SERVICES SHALL COLLABORATE WITH STATE AGENCIES, COMPANIES, AND
STAKEHOLDER ORGANIZATIONS; AND ESTABLISHING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; AND PROVIDING
AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”